Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1809.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3525 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania 123456789101112131415161718 Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3525. Protective equipment for motorcycle riders.(a) Protective headgear.--[Except as provided in subsection (d), no person shall operate or ride upon a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle (other than a motorized pedalcycle) unless he is wearing] Each person operating or riding as a passenger on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall wear protective headgear which complies with standards established by the department.[(b) Eye-protective devices.--No person shall operate or ride upon a motorcycle (other than a motorized pedalcycle or a three-wheeled motorcycle equipped with an enclosed cab) unless he is wearing an eye-protective device of a type approved by the department.(c) Approval of equipment.--The department may approve or disapprove protective headgear and eye-protective devices required under this section and may issue and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for the approval of the headgear and devices. The department shall publish lists of all protective headgear and eye-protective devices by name and type which have been approved.(d) Exception.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to the following:(1) The operator or any occupant of a three-wheeled motorcycle equipped with an enclosed cab.(2) A person 21 years of age or older who has been licensed to operate a motorcycle for not less than two full calendar years.(3) A person 21 years of age or older who has completed a motorcycle rider safety course approved by the department or the Motorcycle Safety Foundation.20250HB1809PN2224 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The passenger of a person exempt under this subsection if the passenger is 21 years of age or older.](e) Penalties.--A person who violates this section:(1) Shall pay a fine of $100 for a first offense.(2) Shall pay a fine of $200 for a second or subsequent violation.(3) Shall not receive any penalty points for a violation of this section.(f) Applicability.--This section shall apply to each motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, including three-wheeled motorcycles, unless fully enclosed, regardless of operator age, experience or licensing.Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 3525.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1809PN2224 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516